Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-5] Oahu transportation management
area metropolitan planning organization revolving fund. (a) There is
established in the state treasury a revolving fund to be known as the Oahu
transportation management area metropolitan planning organization revolving
fund to be administered by the department of transportation in accordance with
federal law and into which shall be deposited:

(1) Member financial dues;

(2) All revenues from the operations of the Oahu transportation
management area metropolitan planning organization;

(3) Appropriations by the legislature out of the
state highway fund to the Oahu transportation management area metropolitan
planning organization revolving fund;

(4) Federal funds or grants; and

(5) Gifts, grants, and any other moneys made
available to the fund.

(b) Except
as otherwise provided by federal law, expenditures from the Oahu transportation
management area metropolitan planning organization revolving fund may be made;
provided that no expenditure shall be made from and no obligation shall be
incurred against the revolving fund in excess of the amount standing to the
credit of the revolving fund or for any purpose for which the revolving fund
may not lawfully be expended. Nothing in sections 37-31 to 37-41 shall require
the proceeds of the revolving fund to be reappropriated annually.

(c) The Oahu metropolitan planning
organization shall report annually to the legislature no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session beginning with the regular
session of 2016 on a detailed accounting of the activities of the revolving
fund for the previous year. [L 2015, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next